Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
CHAPTER 387 Guardians, Limited Guardians, and Conservators

387.010.
Definitions for KRS 387.010 to 387.280.

As used in KRS

387.010

to

387.280

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Minor” means any person who has not reached the age of eighteen (18).

“Interested person or entity” means an adult relative or friend of the minor, an official or representative of a public or private agency, corporation, or association concerned with the minor’s welfare, or any other person found suitable by the District Court.

“Guardian” means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the District Court to have care, custody, and control of a minor and to manage the minor’s financial resources.

“Limited guardian” means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the District Court to have care, custody, and control of a minor without the power to manage the minor’s financial resources.

“Conservator” means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the District Court to manage the financial resources of a minor.

“Ward” means a person for whom a guardian, limited guardian, or conservator has been appointed.

“Parent” means a mother or father whose parental rights have not been terminated or suspended by prior court order.

History.

2149: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 100, § 8; 1976, ch. 218, § 39; 1982, ch. 141, § 138, effective July 1, 1982; 1990, ch. 487, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

387.020.
Jurisdiction of District Courts over guardians, limited guardians, and conservators — Venue of proceedings.

District Courts shall have exclusive jurisdiction for the appointment and removal of guardians, limited guardians, and conservators for minors, and for the management and settlement of their accounts.

If the minor is a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, venue for all proceedings under KRS

387.010

to

387.280

shall be:

In the county where the will of the minor’s last surviving parent was probated, if that will nominates a guardian, limited guardian, or conservator pursuant to KRS

387.040

;

In all other cases, in the county where the minor resides.

If the minor is not a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, the venue for all proceedings under KRS

387.010

to

387.280

shall be in the county where the real or personal property of the minor is located, or if the minor has real or personal property in more than one (1) county, then venue shall be in any one (1) of the counties where property of the minor is located and where proceedings are first brought for the appointment of a guardian, limited guardian, or conservator.

History.

2015: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 195, § 1; 1968, ch. 200, § 3; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 329, effective January 2, 1978; 1990, ch. 487, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

387.025.
Application for appointment as guardian, limited guardian, or conservator.

Any interested person or entity may petition the District Court for the appointment of a guardian or limited guardian for an unmarried minor.

Any interested person or entity may petition the District Court for appointment of a conservator for a minor who owns real or personal property, or both, requiring management or protection or who has or may have business interests that may be jeopardized or prevented by minority, or who needs a conservator to settle or compromise claims.

The petition for appointment shall set forth the following:

The name and address of the minor;

The date of birth of the minor;

The name and address of the minor’s spouse, if any;

The names and addresses of the minor’s parents, or if the minor has no living parent, the names and addresses of the minor’s adult next of kin;

The name and address of the individual or facility having custody of the minor;

The facts and reasons supporting the need for a guardianship, limited guardianship, or conservatorship for the minor;

A description and approximation of the value of the minor’s real and personal property and other financial resources, including government benefits, insurance entitlements, and anticipated yearly income;

The name and address of the petitioner;

The name and address of the petitioner’s attorney, if any; and

The name and address of the person or entity desiring appointment as guardian, limited guardian, or conservator.

The petition shall be accompanied by a verified application of the person or entity desiring appointment as guardian, limited guardian, or conservator. The application shall set forth the following:

Name, address, and age of the applicant;

The applicant’s relationship to the minor, if any;

Whether or not the applicant has ever been convicted of a crime; and

The applicant’s qualifications to serve as guardian, limited guardian, or conservator.

The District Court shall appoint a time for hearing the petition and application. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given not less than five (5) days prior to the hearing to the minor, if the minor is more than fourteen (14) years of age, and to each of the persons or entities required to be named in the petition. Proof of notice shall be made in accordance with the provisions of KRS

395.016

. Notice may be waived as provided in KRS

395.016

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 5; 1976, ch. 218, § 41; 1982, ch. 141, § 101, effective July 1, 1982; 1990, ch. 487, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2005, ch. 85, § 695, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 251, § 8, effective July 12, 2006.

387.030.
Order of precedence for appointment of guardian. [Repealed.]

387.032.
Matters to be considered by court when making appointment.

In appointing a guardian, limited guardian, or conservator, the District Court shall appoint any person or entity whose appointment would be in the best interest of the minor, taking into consideration the ability of the person or entity to manage and preserve the minor’s estate, and taking into consideration the person or entity nominated pursuant to KRS

387.040

or

387.050

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

387.035.
Order of precedence for appointment of a committee. [Repealed.]

387.040.
Appointment by will.

The last surviving parent of a minor may by will nominate a guardian, or alternatively a limited guardian, or conservator, or both, for the minor. One (1) person or entity may be nominated to manage the minor’s financial resources and another to have care, custody, and control of the minor.

History.

2016: amend. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 5, effective July 13, 1990.

387.050.
Nomination by minor fourteen years of age or older.

If the minor is fourteen (14) years of age or older, the minor may, in the presence of the District Court, or by a writing signed in the presence of the judge, after privy examination, nominate his own guardian, limited guardian, or conservator, or if the minor be absent from the county, the minor may after privy examination, in the presence of the District Judge of the county where the minor is, or if the minor be in the military or naval services of the United States, after privy examination, in the presence of a superior commanding officer, by a writing signed in the presence of the judge or superior officer nominate his own guardian, limited guardian, or conservator, provided that the judge or the commanding officer certify to the District Judge of the county having jurisdiction to appoint a guardian, limited guardian, or conservator for the minor that the writing was signed by the minor after privy examination in the presence of the judge or officer.

History.

2022: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 330, effective January 2, 1978; 1990, ch. 487, § 6, effective July 13, 1990.

387.060.
Guardian to control ward and his estate — Compensation. [Repealed.]

387.065.
Powers, duties, and responsibilities of guardian.

A guardian of a ward shall have the powers and responsibilities of a parent regarding the ward’s support, care, and education, but a guardian shall not be personally liable for the ward’s expenses and shall not be liable to third persons by reason of the relationship for acts of the ward.

In particular and without qualifying the foregoing, a guardian shall:

Take custody of the person of the ward and establish the ward’s place of abode within the Commonwealth; and

Take reasonable care of the ward’s personal effects.

A guardian may:

Receive money payable for the support of the ward to the ward’s parent, guardian, or custodian under the terms of any statutory benefit or insurance system or any private contract, devise, trust, or custodianship;

Consent to medical or other professional care, treatment, or advice for the ward, without liability by reason of the consent, for injury to the ward resulting from the negligence or acts of third persons unless a parent would have been liable in the circumstances;

Consent to the ward’s marriage, adoption, or enlistment in military service;

Extend funds of the ward’s estate for the support of persons legally dependent on the ward.

A guardian shall expend or distribute income or principal of the ward’s estate without District Court authorization or confirmation for the support, care, and education of the ward. The District Court may limit or restrict the guardian’s exercise of this power.

In performing the guardian’s duties relating to support, care, and education of the ward, a guardian shall consider:

Recommendations relating to the appropriate standard of support, care, and education for the ward made by a parent or limited guardian, if any:

The size of the estate under the guardian’s supervision or control;

The ward’s age, capacities, limitations, needs, opportunities, and physical and mental health;

The likelihood that the ward will be able to labor and earn money when the ward becomes an adult;

The accustomed standard of living of the ward; and

Other funds or sources used for the support of the ward which have not been placed under the control or supervision of the guardian.

A guardian shall not provide for the support, care, or education of a ward which a parent of the ward is legally obligated and financially able to provide.

Funds expended under this section may be paid by a guardian to any person, including the ward, to reimburse for expenditures that the guardian might have made, or in advance for services to be rendered to the ward if it is reasonable to expect the services will be performed and advance payments are customary or reasonably necessary under the circumstances.

When a ward attains age eighteen (18), the guardian, after meeting all claims and expenses of administration, shall pay over and distribute all funds and properties to the ward as soon as possible, unless:

The ward has been determined to be disabled or partially disabled under KRS

387.500

to

387.770

, in which event the ward’s funds and properties shall be paid over and distributed to the guardian, limited guardian, conservator, or limited conservator appointed pursuant to KRS

387.500

to

387.770

; or

The guardian has reason to believe that the ward is disabled or partially disabled as defined in KRS

387.510

, in which event, the guardian shall institute a proceeding for appointment of a guardian, limited guardian, conservator or limited conservator pursuant to KRS 387.500 to 387.770.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 7, effective July 13, 1990.

387.070.
Bonding of guardian or conservator.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no guardian or conservator shall act until the guardian or conservator has been appointed by the proper District Court, and given bond to the Commonwealth of Kentucky with good surety, either corporate or personal, approved by the District Court to faithfully discharge the trust of guardian or conservator. The bond shall be carefully kept by the clerk of the District Court in a book to be provided for that purpose.

A limited guardian shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

If the person or entity appointed by the District Court as guardian or conservator is a person or entity nominated pursuant to KRS

387.040

, and the will of the parent making the nomination requests no surety on the bond of the guardian or conservator, no surety shall be required on the bond, unless the District Court deems it imprudent to dispense with surety because of a change of circumstances since the will was made or for other good cause.

If the District Court directs that the assets of a ward’s estate be deposited in a restricted account as set out in KRS

387.122

, the guardian or conservator shall be exempt from giving surety on his or her bond.

No master or other commissioner whose duty it is to settle the accounts of a guardian or conservator, nor judge or clerk of a court, or practicing attorney, shall be accepted as surety on the bond of a guardian or conservator.

History.

2017 to 2020: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 331, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 259, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 487, § 11, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 321, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2005, ch. 135, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

387.080.
Recovery of damages on bond.

Anyone damaged by the act or omission of the ward’s guardian or conservator may sue upon the bond of the guardian or conservator for damages, including reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred in collecting damages. With the assent of the District Court, anyone may sue on the bond as next friend of the ward before the ward has attained full age.

If a guardian or conservator commits waste of the ward’s estate, the guardian or conservator and surety for the guardian or conservator shall be liable on the bond to the ward for damages, including reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred in collecting damages.

History.

2023, 2333: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 332, effective January 2, 1978; 1990, ch. 487, § 12, effective July 13, 1990.

387.090.
Removal of guardian, limited guardian or conservator.

The District Court shall remove a guardian, limited guardian, or conservator if:

The guardian, limited guardian, or conservator becomes insane, moves out of the Commonwealth, becomes incapable of discharging the duties of the appointment, or fails for any reason to discharge the duties of the appointment; or

The District Court deems the removal of the guardian, limited guardian, or conservator to be in the best interest of the ward.

The District Court may permit a guardian, limited guardian, or conservator to resign if the guardian, limited guardian, or conservator first files a final settlement and delivers the ward’s estate as directed by the District Court.

When a guardian, limited guardian, or conservator resigns or is removed from office by the District Court, the District Court shall appoint a new person or entity to serve as the ward’s guardian, limited guardian, or conservator.

The District Court may remove a guardian, limited guardian, or conservator for failing to make an account or inventory as required by law, or as may be required by the District Court, or for failing to give additional surety when required.

History.

2024, 2026: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 111, § 154, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 67, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 487, § 14, effective July 13, 1990.

387.100.
Inventory of ward’s estate.

A guardian or conservator shall, within sixty (60) days after appointment, file with the District Court a true and correct inventory of the ward’s real and personal property and other financial resources, signed by the guardian or conservator and verified by the affidavit of the guardian or conservator. If other property afterward comes to the guardian’s or conservator’s knowledge, the guardian or conservator shall file a supplementary inventory thereof within sixty (60) days from the time of obtaining such knowledge.

The inventory shall describe the real property and where situated, with its probable value, and the probable value of its rent. It shall include a list of all personal property, including debts due the ward, with its probable value.

History.

2027, 2028, 2029: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 24; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 333, effective January 2, 1978; 1990, ch. 487, § 15, effective July 13, 1990.

387.110.
Jurisdiction of circuit courts over guardians. [Repealed.]

387.111.
Compensation for guardians, limited guardians, and conservators — Reimbursement for expenses.

Guardians, limited guardians, and conservators shall receive reasonable compensation for services rendered and reimbursement for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the exercise of their assigned duties and powers, including reimbursement for room, board, and clothing personally provided to the ward and shall not exceed that provided for in KRS

387.760

. The compensation and reimbursement shall be paid from the estate of the ward.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 16, effective July 13, 1990; 2008, ch. 130, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 28, § 19, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Guardian and Ward of Minors, § 261.00.

387.120.
Limitation of disbursements for care of minor — Court order to use principal of personalty. [Repealed.]

387.122.
Certain assets subject to withdrawal only upon authorization of court.

The District Court may direct that all or some part of the assets of a ward’s estate be deposited in a bank, trust company, or insured savings and loan company authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth or in a single-premium deferred annuity, subject to withdrawal by the guardian or conservator only upon authorization of the District Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 13, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Motion for Expenditure of Ward’s Funds, Form 261.15.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order Authorizing Expenditure of Ward’s Funds, Form 261.17.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Guardian and Ward of Minors, § 261.00.

387.125.
Guardian’s duty as to use of ward’s assets.

A guardian shall apply the income or principal of the ward’s estate to the payment of debts, taxes, claims, charges, and expenses of the guardianship and, in accordance with KRS

387.065

, for the support, care, and education of the ward or the ward’s dependents.

A guardian shall take possession of all of the ward’s real and personal property.

A guardian may sell any of the ward’s personal property without District Court authorization or confirmation. To sell any of the ward’s real property, a guardian shall comply with the provisions of KRS Chapter 389A.

A guardian shall invest any of the ward’s money or property which is not required for the ward’s current support, care and education. The investments made of a ward’s funds shall be investments authorized by KRS

386.020

.

A guardian may expend the ward’s funds to repair and maintain the ward’s personal and real property.

A guardian may institute or defend actions, claims, or proceedings in any jurisdiction for the protection of the ward’s estate. Subject to the approval of the court in which the action, claim, or proceeding has been filed, a guardian may settle or compromise the action, claim, or proceeding on behalf of the ward. If the action, claim, or proceeding has not been filed in any court, the District Court of the county where a guardian qualified shall approve the settlement or compromise. Upon approval of a settlement or compromise, a guardian may execute a release on behalf of the ward. A guardian shall receive any proceeds from a settlement for management in accordance with the provisions of this statute.

A guardian may lease any real property of the ward until the ward reaches majority, but no lease shall be made for a term longer than seven (7) years unless otherwise approved by the District Court.

A guardian shall obtain approval from the District Court of the county where the guardian qualified for any of the following made on behalf of the ward:

Any lease of mineral rights;

Any lease of oil and gas rights;

Any sale of timber owned by the ward; or

Any consolidation agreement, as defined by KRS

353.220

.

To aid it in making the decision on a proposed sale, lease, or consolidation agreement, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the ward. The guardian ad litem shall report to the court on the suitability of the transaction.

A guardian shall comply with the reporting requirements specified in KRS

387.175

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 8, effective July 13, 1990.

387.130.
Guardian to pay debts of ward’s ancestor — To collect ward’s claims and represent his interests. [Repealed.]

387.135.
Powers and duties of limited guardian.

A limited guardian shall have the powers and duties specified in KRS 387.065(1) to (3).

A limited guardian shall apply any property of the ward made available by the ward’s conservator for the current support, care, and education of the ward.

Any excess property of the ward which is not required for the ward’s current needs shall be paid by the limited guardian to the ward’s conservator.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 9, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Guardian and Ward of Minors, § 261.00.

387.137.
Powers and duties of conservator.

A conservator shall have the powers and duties specified in KRS

387.125

and KRS 387.065(4) to (8).

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 10, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Guardian and Ward of Minors, § 261.00.

387.140.
Sale or lease of property by guardian. [Repealed.]

387.150.
Leasing of mineral rights by guardian. [Repealed.]

387.160.
Procedure for approval of lease — Bond of guardian. [Repealed.]

387.170.
Accounting and settlement by guardian for income from lease — Assignment of one-half of income from lease to surviving spouse where dower and curtesy is outstanding in mineral rights — Descent of leasehold estate. [Repealed.]

387.175.
Accountings of the execution of the trust.

A guardian and conservator shall file accounts of the execution of the guardian’s or conservator’s trust. The accountings shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

395.610

to

395.657

and KRS

395.990

, and shall be made in accordance with those provisions, except as follows:

An accounting of a guardian or conservator shall be filed one (1) year after appointment of the guardian or conservator, and annually thereafter unless the ward’s net estate is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less, in which case the accounting shall be made on a biennial basis;

Each accounting shall include, in addition to the items specified in KRS

395.610

, a plan for preserving and maintaining the estate under the control or supervision of the guardian or conservator. This subsection shall not be applicable to estates of wards with a net value of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 17, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Guardian and Ward of Minors, § 261.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Periodic/Final Settlement of Guardian/Conservator for Minor/Disabled Person (AOC 856), Form 261.09.

387.180.
Settlement of guardian’s accounts. [Repealed.]

387.185.
Powers of foreign guardian or conservator.

A foreign guardian or conservator of a ward who is not a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky may sue for, collect, receive, and remove from the Commonwealth the ward’s personal property located in the Commonwealth, if the District Court of the county having venue pursuant to KRS

387.020

, after notice and hearing determines that:

The foreign guardian or conservator was appointed and qualified according to the law of the state where the ward resides;

The foreign guardian or conservator has given bond in the state where the foreign guardian or conservator qualified with sufficient surety to account for all the ward’s estate, including the property to be removed from Kentucky;

Neither the ward nor any of the ward’s creditors shall be prejudiced by removal of the ward’s property from the Commonwealth.

Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given not less than ten (10) days prior to the hearing to the ward’s resident guardian, limited guardian, or conservator, if any, or to the ward’s adult next of kin, if there is no guardian, limited guardian, or conservator in this Commonwealth. Proof of notice shall be made in accordance with the provisions of KRS

395.016

. Notice may be waived as provided in KRS

395.016

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 18, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Petition by Foreign Guardian for Authority, Form 261.21.

387.190.
Nonresident guardian of nonresident ward — Powers. [Repealed.]

387.200.
Removal of property of ward from state.

Resident guardians and conservators shall not remove out of this Commonwealth any of the property of their wards without first obtaining the approval of a District Court of the county in which the guardian or conservator was qualified. The District Court, upon the petition sworn to by the guardian or conservator and such proof as may be deemed necessary, may authorize the removal of the property of the ward out of this Commonwealth, upon terms and conditions that are equitable and just and will secure and protect the rights and interests of the ward. Guardians and conservators may be restrained from the unlawful removal of property of their wards out of this Commonwealth upon the petition of the ward by next friend, or upon the petition of any surety on the bond of the guardian or conservator.

History.

2043: amend. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 19, effective July 13, 1990.

387.210.
Jurisdiction of district courts over incompetent persons and their committees — Bond of committee — Waiver of Bond. [Repealed.]

387.220.
Inquest required for appointment of committee — Oath to jury — Functions of “visitor.” [Repealed.]

387.230.
Powers and duties of committee — Personal charge may be given to another person — Compensation. [Repealed.]

387.240.
Sale of real property by committee; distribution of insolvent estate. [Repealed.]

387.250.
Leasing of mineral rights by committee. [Repealed.]

387.260.
Verification of claims against estate. [Repealed.]

387.270.
Interest charged guardians or conservators.

If from any source a balance is owing by a guardian or conservator at the end of any year, counting from the time of appointment of the guardian or conservator, which should have been invested for the benefit of the ward in reasonable time but which remains in the guardian’s or conservator’s hands, the guardian or conservator shall be charged with the legal rate of interest compounded annually from the end of the year in which the balance arose.

However, nothing in this section shall prohibit or prevent a guardian or conservator from accounting for or being chargeable with sums in excess of the rates herein fixed realized upon any investment of trust funds made by the guardian or conservator.

History.

2035, 2035a-1: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 259, § 6, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 141, § 139, effective July 1, 1982; 1990, ch. 487, § 20, effective July 13, 1990.

387.278.
Settlement agreement by person with legal custody of minor — Affidavit or verified statement — Payment — Withdrawal or transfer from account — Effect of agreement — Liability —Filing for guardianship or conservatorship.

A person having legal custody of a minor may settle or compromise and enter into a settlement agreement with a person against whom the minor has a claim or from whom the minor is to receive proceeds from the sale of real estate, for the settlement of any estate, or from any other source if:

A guardian or conservator has not been appointed for the minor;

The total amount of the settlement proceeds due to the minor, after reduction from the total settlement amount of all medical expenses, medical liens, all other liens, and reasonable attorney fees and costs, is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less if paid in cash, by draft or check, by direct deposit, or by the purchase of a premium for an annuity;

The moneys payable under the settlement agreement will be paid as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section; and

The person entering into the settlement agreement on behalf of the minor completes an affidavit or verified statement that attests that the person:

Has made a reasonable inquiry and that to the best of the person’s knowledge:

The minor will be fully compensated by the settlement; or

There is no practical way to obtain additional amounts from the party or parties entering into the settlement agreement with the minor; and

Understands and acknowledges that he or she is obligated by law to deposit the settlement directly into a restricted savings or other restricted investment account, or purchase an annuity, as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

The attorney representing the person entering into the settlement agreement on behalf of the minor, if any, shall maintain the affidavit or verified statement completed under subsection (1)(d) of this section in the attorney’s file for a period of five (5) years.

The moneys payable under the settlement agreement shall be paid as follows:

If the minor or person entering into the settlement agreement on behalf of the minor is represented by an attorney and the settlement is paid in cash, by draft or check, or by direct deposit into the attorney’s trust account maintained under Rule 3.830 of the Supreme Court of Kentucky to be held for the benefit of the minor, the attorney shall:

Timely deposit the moneys received on behalf of the minor directly into a restricted savings or other restricted investment account that only allows withdrawals from the account under any of the circumstances set forth in subsection (4) of this section; or

Purchase an annuity by direct payment to the issuer of the annuity with the minor designated as the sole beneficiary of the annuity;

If the minor or person entering into the settlement agreement on behalf of the minor is not represented by an attorney and the settlement is paid by check, draft, or direct deposit, the minor or person entering into the settlement agreement on behalf of the minor shall provide the person or entity with whom the minor has settled the claim with the information sufficient to draw a check or draft made payable, or complete an electronic transfer of settlement funds:

Into a restricted savings or other restricted investment account that only allows withdrawals from the account under any of the circumstances set forth in subsection (4) of this section; or

To purchase an annuity by direct payment to the issuer of the annuity with the minor designated as the sole beneficiary of the annuity; and

If the minor is under the care, custody, and control of the Commonwealth, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall establish a restricted trust account, or subaccount of a trust account, that earns interest for the benefit of the minor, for the purpose of receiving moneys payable to the minor under the settlement agreement. If the settlement is paid:

In cash or by draft or check, the moneys received on behalf of the minor shall be timely deposited into the account established under this paragraph, and notice of the deposit to the minor and the person entering into the settlement agreement on behalf of the minor shall be delivered by personal service or first-class mail;

By direct deposit, the minor, the person entering into the settlement on behalf of the minor, or the cabinet shall provide the person or entity with whom the minor has settled the claim with the information sufficient to complete an electronic transfer of settlement funds into the account established under this paragraph, and notice of the deposit to the minor and the person entering into the settlement agreement on behalf of the minor shall be delivered by personal service or first-class mail; or

Through the purchase of an annuity, direct payment shall be made to the issuer of the annuity with the minor designated as the sole beneficiary of the annuity.

The moneys in the minor’s restricted savings or other restricted investment account, trust account, or trust subaccount established under subsection (3) of this section may not be withdrawn, removed, paid out, or transferred to any person, including the minor, except as follows:

Pursuant to court order;

Upon the minor attaining the age of majority or being otherwise emancipated; or

Upon the minor’s death.

A signed settlement agreement entered into on behalf of the minor in compliance with subsection (1) of this section is binding on the minor without the need for court approval or review, has the same force and effect as if the minor were a competent adult entering into the settlement agreement, shall serve to fully release all claims of the minor encompassed by the settlement agreement, and may be relied on by a financial institution or other entity, in lieu of a court order, when opening a restricted savings or other restricted investment account, or purchasing an annuity, on behalf of a minor pursuant to this section.

Any person or entity against whom a minor has a claim that settles the claim with the minor in good faith under this section shall not be liable to the minor for any claims arising from the settlement of the claim.

An insurer who in good faith transfers funds at the direction of the settling minor or the minor’s representatives into a restricted savings or other restricted investment account, or to purchase an annuity, shall not be liable to the minor or the minor’s representatives for any claims arising from the use of those funds after the transfer is completed.

Nothing in this section shall prevent anyone acting on behalf of the minor from filing for guardianship, limited guardianship, or conservatorship in the District Court and requesting the District Court to approve the settlement on behalf of the minor and oversee the settlement proceeds.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 182, § 1, effective April 8, 2022.

387.280.
Handling amount of not more than $10,000 due to person under disability who has reached age of 18.

When a person under disability who has reached the age of eighteen (18), having no guardian or conservator, is entitled to receive a sum not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), exclusive of interest, in any action in which real estate has been sold, or in the settlement of any estate, or from any other source, the person having custody of the person under disability may settle or compromise the dollar amount when in the interest of the person under disability.

The court in which the action is pending, or, if the sum does not derive from the action, the District Court, may order the sum to be paid to the person having custody of the person under disability. Before entering the order, the court shall approve any settlement or compromise and shall be satisfied by affidavit or oral testimony that the person under disability is in the custody of the person to whom it is proposed to pay the money and the latter, upon withdrawal of the money, shall be under obligation as trustee to expend it, for the support, maintenance, or education of the person under disability.

When the order is made, no bond shall be required of the person having custody of the person under disability. If the sum due to the person under disability is from the sale of real property, the purchaser of the real property may pay the share of the person under disability into court, and no lien shall remain on the property therefor. The money may be withdrawn by the person mentioned in the order without that person giving bond.

A release executed by the person to whom the court has ordered the sum paid shall have the same effect as a release by a duly appointed guardian.

HISTORY:

3885-1: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 115, § 3; 1950, ch. 102; 1956, ch. 201; 1970, ch. 266, § 1; 1976, ch. 218, § 20; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 340, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 259, § 7, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 141, § 140, effective July 1, 1982; 1990, ch. 487, § 21, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 425, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 92, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2022 ch. 182, § 2, effective April 8, 2022.

387.281.
Jurisdiction to appoint special committee to receive funds from governmental agency for support of indigents. [Repealed.]

387.282.
Petition for appointment of special committee. [Repealed.]

387.283.
Bond of special committee. [Repealed.]

387.284.
Powers of special committee — Accounts. [Repealed.]

387.285.
Compensation of special committee — Costs of settlement. [Repealed.]

387.286.
Application of other statutes. [Repealed.]

387.287.
Limited committee for mentally retarded person — Functions — Report. [Repealed.]

387.288.
Petition to change or modify committee. [Repealed.]

387.289.
Application of KRS 387.010 to 387.280.

The provisions of KRS

387.010

to

387.280

shall apply to:

Any guardian, limited guardian, or conservator appointed after July 13, 1990; and

Any guardian for a minor ward appointed prior to July 13, 1990, unless the guardian was appointed pursuant to KRS

387.500

to

387.770

.

A guardian for a minor ward appointed prior to July 13, 1990, shall have the powers and duties:

Specified in KRS

387.135

, if the guardian was appointed to have care, custody and control of a minor;

Specified in KRS

387.137

, if the guardian was appointed to manage the financial resources of a minor;

Specified in KRS

387.065

and

387.125

, if the guardian was appointed to have care, custody, and control of a minor and to manage the minor’s financial resources.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 487, § 24, effective July 13, 1990.

387.290.
Curator for convict — Appointment — Powers and duties.

The District Court of the county from which the convict was sent to the penitentiary, or of the county of his residence if he had one in this state, may, upon the application of anyone interested, appoint a suitable curator of the estate of any person over the age of twenty-one (21) years confined in the penitentiary.

If the convict has a spouse the District Court shall appoint the spouse curator if the spouse can give satisfactory security, and if not, then the person the spouse selects in person or by written direction to the court.

The curator shall execute a bond similar to that required of curators in a case of contest concerning a will. He shall be clothed with like powers, have like privileges, discharge like duties, and be liable to like responsibilities as are provided in the case of the curator of an estate pending a contest concerning a will, except that he shall, out of the effects held by him, provide for the support of the family and the education of the minor children of the convict. He shall expend in these respects the sum authorized by the District Court, and he shall account with the convict when he is discharged from the penitentiary.

History.

1383 to 1385: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 386, § 71; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 343, effective January 2, 1978.